Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.045

Corporate name.

The corporate name must comply with the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4103; 1998 c 102 s 4; 1995 c 337 s 22; 1994 c 211 s 1307; 1987 c 55 s 41; 1982 c 35 s 121; 1973 c 113 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1995 c 337: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 337 s 23.]

Effective date—1994 c 211: See note following RCW 18.04.025.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Corporate name of foreign corporation: RCW 24.06.350.